Utah statutes.
31A-6a-109.   Enforcement provisions.

Anyone violating of any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule made pursuant to the grant of rulemaking authority under this title may be assessed an administrative forfeiture equal to two times the amount of any profit gained from the violation.  In addition an administrative forfeiture may be assessed for each violation not to exceed $1,000 per violation.  If the violations are continuing, or are of a serious nature, or a person's business practices in connection with the solicitation, sale, offering for sale, or performance under a service contract subject to this chapter, constitute a danger to the legitimate interests of consumers or the public, the commissioner may enjoin the person from soliciting, selling, or offering to sell service contracts in this state either permanently or for a stated period of time.



Enacted by Chapter 203, 1992 General Session

